src/phonology/sme-phon.twolc
"Stem Vowel in Present Participials from i-Verbs"
  a:i <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X1: | X4: | X5: | X7: | X8: | ( ∑ ) # | Hyph | s | n | %^DISIMP: ] ;
! a:i <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X1: | X4: | X5: | X7: | X8: | ( ∑ ) # | Hyph ] ;
! The problem with the old one was that it didnºt trigger for Essive and for
! the Px forms of the nominative.
! The new one isnºt perfect, the s and n are rather quasi for Ess and Px.

"Stem Vowel in Dual and Pl 1st Person Imperative"             ! jearra:jearru
  Vx:u <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Y2: ;                                 ! boahºti:boahttu
			where Vx in (a i) ;
!!€ jearraY2
!!€ jearru0

!!€ boahºtiY2
!!€ boahttu0


"Stem Vowel in Plural 2nd Person Imperative"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q2: ;                               ! boahºti:bohtet
   Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Y3: ;                               ! čuorºvu:čurvot
			where Vx in (a i u)
			      Vy in (e e o)
			matched ;
! Q2 context replaced by other rule for both imperative and other categories
!!€ jearraQ2t
!!€ je0rre0t

!! boahºtiY4t ! It seems it should be Q3. ... both?!
!!€ boahºtiQ3t
!!€ bo0h0to0t


!! čuorºvuY4t ! Q2, it seems.
!!€ čuorºvuQ2t
!!€ ču0r0vo0t

"Stem Vowel in Imperative Plural 1st Person and Passive Stem"
  Vx:o <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ Y4: | Y7: ] ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) (Y5:) [Cns: - j:i| ( ∑ ) #] ;
		   where Vx in (a i u) ;


! Y7 Testing passive forms
!!€ jearraY7t#
!!€ je0rro0t#

!!€ boahºtiY7t#
!!€ bo0htto0t#

!!€ čuorºvuY7t#
!!€ ču0r0vo0t#

!!€ jearraY7juvvot#
!!€ je0rro0juvvot#

! Conflict: a:{o,u} <=> Cns _ Y7: {j: / unspecified}

!"Stem Vowel in Past Tense of Derived Passive Stem"
!  Vx:u <=> Cns _  Y7: (Y6:) j: ;
!			where Vx in (a i) ;

! This battlefield will be cleaned up, eventually, but we leave it as-is
! for a while, so that Thomas and others can have a look at the ruins.

! New oldrule
 "Stem Vowel in Past Tense of Derived Passive Stem"
   Vx:u <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Y7: (Y6:) j:i [ ( ∑ ) #|m|d|g] ;
             where Vx in (a i)  ;
! for jerrui.


!!€ jearraY7j#
!!€ je0rru0i#

!!€ dahºkaY7j#
!!€ dahkku0i#

!!€ loikaY7j#
!!€ loiku0i#


! Old rule
! "Stem Vowel in Past Tense of Derived Passive Stem"
!   Vx:u <=> Cns _  Y7: Y6: j: ;
!            where Vx in (a i)  ;

! Put Y6 into paranthesis, otherwise o:u stem vowel shift doesnºt work in Passive+Ind+Prt+Sg3 of
! Impersonals and intransitives. (TO)
! But we donºt have passives of impersonals and intransitives, do we ?! So, what was
! the reason for changing the rule? (TT) yes we have passives of impersonals and intransitives:-) (TO):
!arvit+V+IV+Pass+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!arvojuvvui
!arvui


! Stem vowel deletion in compounding
! ---------------------------------------------

"á-stem vowel deletion"
 á:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: ( ∑ ) # ;

"a-stem vowel deletion"
 a:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: ( ∑ ) #  ;
           e: _ b: b: o: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [X2:|X3:|X6:]; !Diphthong Simplification in -eabbo comparatives


"i-stem vowel deletion"
 i:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: ( ∑ ) #  ;

"u-stem vowel deletion"
 u:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: ( ∑ ) #  ;

"e-stem vowel deletion"
 e:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: ( ∑ ) #  ;

"o-stem vowel deletion"
 o:0 <=> Cns: _ W3: ( ∑ ) #  ;



! Special word final consonants
! -----------------------------

"Word Final Deletion of n8 m8 g8 h8"                   ! beatnag8:beana
  Cx:0 <=> Vow _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X4: | X8: | X6: Cns: | X9: | W4: ] ;      ! luopmán8:luomi
			where Cx in (DelCns) matched ; ! giellum8:gielu
!!€ beatnag8X4
!!€ bea0na00

!!€ luopmin8X4
!!€ luo0mi00

!!€ giellum8X4
!!€ gie0lu00



"Word Final Neutralization of g8, h8, m8"
  Cx:Cy <=> Vow _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X2: | X7: ] [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ;
			where Cx in (g8 h8 m8)
			      Cy in (t  t  n )
			matched ;

! Please add a test or two:
! €
! €




! Appendix: Deleted rules that still need attention
! -------------------------------------------------





!"Postvocalic j Surfacing"
!  j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | º: | ( :0 - Y5: - Y6:)+  [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ] ; !more and more dummies...
! j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | º: | ( :0 - Y5: )+  [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ] ; !more dummies...
! j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( Dummy: ) _ [ Cns | º: | ( :0 - Y5: )   [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] ] ; !1.138
! j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) ( Dummy: ) _ [(Dummy:* - Y5: -Y6:    ) [ [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ] | Cns: ([ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]) ]]; ! bad bec. Ess almmájin *almmáiin almmájX4in
! j:i <=                     _ [Cns | ( DummyNotY5: ) ( ∑ ) # ] ;                             ! <============ 1.1 version:
!!!j:i <=> Vow: (:0) (Dummy:) _ [Cns | º: | (:0 - Y5:) [ Hyph # | #]] ;
!! Changed because:we get almmáj- and not almmái-
!! Postvocalic j surfaces as i
!! Is this what we want?? without right context??? postvoc j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) (Dummy: ) _ ;


! "Word Final Consonant Neutralization 1"  !smirezit : smires, Troandin-bisma
!   Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( :0 - Y5: - Y6: )( :0 - Y5: - Y6: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]  ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _    ( :0 - Y5: )( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]  ; !1.138
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _    ( Dummy: )  ( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]  ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _    ( Dummy:  - Y5: - Y6:  ) [ :0 - Y5: - Y6:] [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]  ; ! 1.155
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _  [ ( Dummy:* - Y5   )       [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]] ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _  [ ( Dummy:* - Y5:  )       [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]] ;
! ! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _  [ ( Dummy:* - Y5: - Y6:  ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]] ; ! not vejolaš
! 			where Cx in (z ž m h p g b d)
! 			      Cy in (s š n t t t t t)
! 			matched ;



!"Word Final Consonant Neutralization 2"
! This is no longer a mystery. For once, we ask for the # symbol in the
! left context. Why we do, is a mystery, but at least now the example works.
! We should thus consider whether the leftmost # is needed in the rule.

! € hálijd>#
! € háliit>#

! € hálijd>#
! € háliid>#

!"Stem Final Consonant Neutralization" !háliidit : háliit
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: Cns* (Vow*) Vow: ( CntrCns:)  _  # ;
!			where Cx in (z ž m h p d g b)
!			      Cy in (s š n t t t t t)
!			matched ;
!
! Old version:
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: (( CntrCns:) Dummy:+) _ ( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]  ;
! This one works for all except háliit.
!
! Tentative version:
! Cx:Cy <=> Vow: ( CntrCns:) (Dummy:+) _ ( :0 - Y5: ) [ Hyph | ( ∑ ) # ]  ;
! The nested left context was changed because of háliidit - háliit.
! NOTE: there are 454 jd# that come out incorrectly with this version.

! Overview over j translations.
! j:j # | Cns _                     ! this is default
! j:i     Vow _ Cns                 ! Most common exception
! j:0     Vow _ [ Y5: | Y6: j: ]    ! Contracted stems
! j:j     Vow _ Vow                 ! if followed by vow-initial suff


! *) footnote 1
! Older, removed versions:
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns: _ StemCns:* : ;
! This one gave vuovden# as only possible form of vuovdin in compounds.
! Vx:Vy <=> [ Vow Vow | á ] Cns:+ Cns _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
! the problem with this one was that it was not restricted to compounds !!
! The X7: | X8: line was commented out since no lexicon in sme-lex.txt
! pointed from X8 to R. This move should be checked for compounds later.

!"Vowel Shortening in Compounds after Long 1st Syllable 2"
!  Vx:Vy <=> [ Hyph | #  | Cns ] Vz Cns+ Cns: Cns+ _ StemCns:* [ X7: | X8: ] ;
!			where Vz in (a i o u) ;
!			where Vx in (u i)
!			      Vy in (o e)
!			matched ;
! XXX Remainder! This rule is commented out since including it
! spoils the i:á alternation of verbs (boahtit:boađán, for some reason.
! This should be looked into.
